Hawaii statutes.
[§5-20] Public display of Hawaiian flag;
position. On every occasion of public display of the Hawaiian flag, within
the State of Hawaii, it shall occupy the position of honor when displayed in
company with the flags of other states, nations or international organizations;
provided, however, that when the United States flag is displayed with the
Hawaiian flag, the national flag shall occupy such position of honor. [L 1990,
c 215, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next